California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) (1) The transit and transportation facilities project has a transportation demand management program and achieves at least 25 percent reduction in vehicle miles traveled as compared to the regional average vehicle miles traveled identified in the sustainable communities strategy or alternative planning strategy applicable at the time of the approval of the transit and transportation facilities project. 

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “transportation demand management program” means a specific program of strategies, incentives, and tools to be implemented, including, with specified annual status reporting obligations, to reduce vehicle trips by providing opportunities for the public to choose sustainable travel options, such as transit, bicycle riding, or walking. A specific program of strategies, incentives, and tools includes, but is not limited to,
 any of the following:

(A) Provision of onsite electric vehicle charging stations in excess of applicable requirements.

(B) Provision of dedicated parking for car share or zero-emission vehicles, or both types of vehicles, in excess of applicable requirements.

(C) Provision of bicycle parking in excess of applicable requirements.

(d) The transit and transportation facilities project proponent certifies that the transit and transportation facilities project will comply with Section 21189.70.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   (AB 2731)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative January 1, 2025.   Repealed on January 1 following inoperative date, pursuant to Section 21189.70.5.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.70.3.

Notwithstanding any other law, Rules 3.2220 to 3.2237, inclusive, of the California Rules of Court, as may be amended by the Judicial Council, shall apply to an action or proceeding brought to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the certification of an environmental impact report for the transit and transportation facilities project approved pursuant to Section 21189.70.2 or the granting of any approvals for this project, including any potential appeals to the court of appeal or the Supreme Court, to be resolved, to the extent feasible, within 270 business days of the filing of the certified record of proceedings with the court. On or before January 1, 2022, the Judicial Council shall amend the California Rules of Court, as necessary, to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   (AB 2731)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative January 1, 2025.   Repealed on January 1 following inoperative date, pursuant to Section 21189.70.5.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.70.4.

Notwithstanding any other law, the preparation and certification of the record of proceedings for the transit and transportation facilities project shall be performed in the following manner:

(a) The lead agency for the transit and transportation facilities project shall prepare the record of proceedings pursuant to this division concurrently with the administrative process.

(b) All documents and other materials placed in the record of proceedings shall be posted on, and be downloadable from, an internet website maintained by the lead agency commencing with the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report.

(c) The
 lead agency shall make available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format the draft environmental impact report and all other documents submitted to, or relied on by, the lead agency in the preparation of the draft environmental impact report.

(d) A document prepared by the lead agency or submitted by the transit and transportation facilities project proponent after the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report that is a part of the record of the proceedings shall be made available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format within five business days after the document is released or received by the lead agency.

(e) The lead agency shall encourage written comments on the transit and transportation facilities project to be submitted in a readily accessible electronic format, and shall make any comment available to the public in a
 readily accessible electronic format within five days of its receipt.

(f) Within 14 business days after the receipt of any comment that is not in an electronic format, the lead agency shall convert that comment into a readily accessible electronic format and make it available to the public in that format.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) to (f), inclusive, documents submitted to or relied on by the lead agency that were not prepared specifically for the transit and transportation facilities project and are copyright protected are not required to be made readily accessible in an electronic format. For those copyright-protected documents, the lead agency shall make an index of these documents available in an electronic format no later than the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report, or within five business days if the document is received or relied on by
 the lead agency after the release of the draft environmental impact report. The index shall specify the libraries or lead agency offices in which hardcopies of the copyrighted materials are available for public review.

(h) The lead agency shall certify the final record of proceedings within five days after the filing of the notice required by subdivision (a) of Section 21152.

(i) Any dispute arising from the record of proceedings shall be resolved by the superior court. Unless the superior court directs otherwise, a party disputing the content of the record of proceedings shall file a motion to augment the record of proceedings at the time it files its initial brief.

(j) The contents of the record of proceedings shall be as set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 21167.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   (AB 2731)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative January 1, 2025.   Repealed on January 1 following inoperative date, pursuant to Section 21189.70.5.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.70.5.

(a) If the lead agency fails to certify an environmental impact report for the transit and transportation facilities project before January 1, 2025, Sections 21189.70.2 to 21189.70.7, inclusive, shall become inoperative and are repealed on January 1 of the following year.

(b) On or before February 1, 2025, the lead agency shall, if it fails to certify the environmental impact report for the transit and transportation facilities project before January 1, 2025, notify the Secretary of State of its failure. 

(c) SANDAG may obtain site control to support the redevelopment of the Old Town Center site, including the transit and transportation facilities project, before completing
 environmental review pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   (AB 2731)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Conditionally repealed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.70.6.

(a) The draft and final environmental impact report for the transit and transportation facilities project shall include a notice in not less than 12-point type stating the following:

THIS ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT REPORT (EIR) IS SUBJECT TO CHAPTER 6.9 (COMMENCING WITH SECTION 21189.70) OF DIVISION 13 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE, WHICH PROVIDES, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THAT THE LEAD AGENCY NEED NOT CONSIDER CERTAIN COMMENTS FILED AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE PUBLIC COMMENT PERIOD FOR THE DRAFT EIR. ANY JUDICIAL ACTION CHALLENGING THE CERTIFICATION OF THE EIR OR THE APPROVAL OF THE PROJECT DESCRIBED IN THE EIR IS SUBJECT TO THE PROCEDURES SET FORTH IN CHAPTER 6.9 (COMMENCING WITH SECTION 21189.70) OF DIVISION 13 OF THE PUBLIC
 RESOURCES CODE. A COPY OF CHAPTER 6.9 (COMMENCING WITH SECTION 21189.70) OF DIVISION 13 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE IS INCLUDED IN THE APPENDIX TO THIS EIR.

(b) The draft environmental impact report and final environmental impact report shall contain, as an appendix, the full text of this section.

(c) Within 10 days after the release of the draft environmental impact report, the lead agency shall conduct an informational workshop to inform the public of the key analyses and conclusions of that report.

(d) Within 10 days before the close of the public comment period, the lead agency shall hold a public hearing to receive testimony on the draft environmental impact report. A transcript of the hearing shall be included as an appendix to the final environmental impact
 report.

(e) (1) Within five days following the close of the public comment period, a commenter on the draft environmental impact report may submit to the lead agency a written request for nonbinding mediation. The lead agency and transit and transportation facilities project proponent shall participate in nonbinding mediation with all commenters who submitted timely comments on the draft environmental impact report and who requested the mediation. Mediation conducted pursuant to this paragraph shall end no later than 35 days after the close of the public comment period.

(2) A request for mediation shall identify all areas of dispute raised in the comment submitted by the commenter that are to be mediated.

(3) The lead agency shall select one or more mediators who shall be retired judges or
 recognized experts with at least five years of experience in land use and environmental law or science, or mediation. The transit and transportation facilities project proponent shall bear the costs of mediation.

(4) A mediation session shall be conducted on each area of dispute with the parties requesting mediation on that area of dispute.

(5) The lead agency shall adopt, as a condition of approval, any measures agreed upon by the lead agency, the transit and transportation facilities project proponent, and any commenter who requested mediation. A commenter who agrees to a measure pursuant to this paragraph shall not raise the issue addressed by that measure as a basis for an action or proceeding challenging the lead agency’s decision to certify the environmental impact report or to grant one or more initial transit and transportation facilities project approvals.

(f) The lead agency need not consider written comments submitted after the close of the public comment period, unless those comments address any of the following:

(1) New issues raised in the response to comments by the lead agency.

(2) New information released by the public agency subsequent to the release of the draft environmental impact report, such as new information set forth or embodied in a staff report, proposed permit, proposed resolution, ordinance, or similar documents.

(3) Changes made to the transit and transportation facilities project after the close of the public comment period.

(4) Proposed conditions for approval, mitigation measures, or proposed findings required by
 Section 21081 or a proposed reporting or monitoring program required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 21081.6, where the lead agency releases those documents subsequent to the release of the draft environmental impact report.

(5) New information that was not reasonably known and could not have been reasonably known during the public comment period.

(g) (1) The lead agency shall file the notice required by subdivision (a) of Section 21152 within five days after the last initial transit and transportation facilities project approval.

(2) (A) The lead agency shall prepare and certify the record of proceedings in accordance with this subdivision and in accordance with Rule 3.1365 of the California Rules of Court. The transit and transportation facilities project
 proponent shall pay the lead agency for all costs of preparing and certifying the record of proceedings.

(B) No later than three business days following the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report, the lead agency shall make available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format the draft environmental impact report and all other documents submitted to or relied on by the lead agency in the preparation of the draft environmental impact report. A document prepared by the lead agency or submitted by the transit and transportation facilities project proponent after the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report that is a part of the record of proceedings shall be made available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format within five business days after the document is prepared or received by the lead agency.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), documents submitted to or relied on by the lead agency that were not prepared specifically for the transit and transportation facilities project and are copyright-protected are not required to be made readily accessible in an electronic format. For those copyright protected documents, the lead agency shall make an index of these documents available in an electronic format no later than the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report, or within five business days if the document is received or relied on by the lead agency after the release of the draft environmental impact report. The index must specify the libraries or lead agency offices in which hardcopies of the copyrighted materials are available for public review.

(D) The lead agency shall encourage written comments on the transit and transportation facilities project to be submitted in a readily accessible electronic
 format, and shall make any such comment available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format within five days of its receipt.

(E) Within seven business days after the receipt of any comment that is not in an electronic format, the lead agency shall convert that comment into a readily accessible electronic format and make it available to the public in that format.

(F) The lead agency shall indicate in the record of proceedings comments received that were not considered by the lead agency pursuant to subdivision (f) and need not include the content of the comments as a part of the record of proceedings.

(G) Within five days after the filing of the notice required by subdivision (a) of Section 21152, the lead agency shall certify the record of proceedings for the approval or determination and shall provide
 an electronic copy of the record of proceedings to a party that has submitted a written request for a copy. The lead agency may charge and collect a reasonable fee from a party requesting a copy of the record of proceedings for the electronic copy, which shall not exceed the reasonable cost of reproducing that copy.

(3) Within 10 days after being served with a complaint or a petition for a writ of mandate, the lead agency shall lodge a copy of the certified record of proceedings with the superior court.

(4) Any dispute over the content of the record of proceedings shall be resolved by the superior court. Unless the superior court directs otherwise, a party disputing the content of the record of proceedings shall file a motion to augment the record of proceedings at the time it files its initial brief.

(5) The
 contents of the record of proceedings shall be as set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 21167.6. 

(h) Except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 21189.70.5, the approval of a transit and transportation facilities project shall be preceded by the certification of a project-level environmental impact report.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   (AB 2731)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative January 1, 2025.   Repealed on January 1 following inoperative date, pursuant to Section 21189.70.5.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.70.7.

Except as provided in this chapter, an action or proceeding to attack, set aside, void, or annul a determination, finding, or decision of the lead agency granting the approval for a transit and transportation facilities project shall be subject to the requirements of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 21165).

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   (AB 2731)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative January 1, 2025.   Repealed on January 1 following inoperative date, pursuant to Section 21189.70.5.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.70.8.

(a) (1) For a transit and transportation facilities project undertaken by a public agency, except as provided in paragraph (2), an entity shall not be prequalified or shortlisted or awarded a contract by the public agency to perform any portion of the transit and transportation facilities project unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment to the public agency that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the transit and transportation facilities project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades.

(2) Paragraph (1) does
 not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(A) The public agency has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the transit and transportation facilities project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(B) The transit and transportation facilities project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the public agency before January 1, 2021.

(C) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all of its subcontractors at every tier performing the transit and
 transportation facilities project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(b) For a transit and transportation facilities project undertaken by a private entity, the transit and transportation facilities project proponent shall do both of the following:

(1) Certify to the lead agency that either of the following is true:

(A) The entirety of the transit and transportation facilities project is a public work for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(B) If the transit and transportation facilities project is not in its entirety a public work, all construction workers employed in the execution of the
 transit and transportation facilities project will be paid at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of
 the Labor Code, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate. If the transit and transportation facilities project is subject to this subparagraph, then, for those portions of the transit and transportation facilities project that are not a public work, all of the following shall apply:

(i) The transit and transportation facilities project proponent shall ensure that the prevailing wage requirement is included in all contracts for the performance of the work.

(ii) All contractors and subcontractors shall pay to all construction workers employed in the execution of the work at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages,
 except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.

(iii) (I) Except as provided in subclause (III), all contractors and subcontractors shall maintain and verify payroll records pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code and make those records available for inspection and copying as provided by that section.

(II) Except as provided in subclause (III), the obligation of the contractors and subcontractors to pay prevailing wages may be enforced by the Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code, within
 18 months after the completion of the transit and transportation facilities project, by an underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action, or by a joint labor-management committee through a civil action under Section 1771.2 of the Labor Code. If a civil wage and penalty assessment is issued, the contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond or bonds issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1742.1 of the Labor Code.

(III) Subclauses (I) and (II) do not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the transit and transportation facilities project are subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the transit and transportation facilities
 project and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure.

(iv) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1773.1 of the Labor Code, the requirement that employer payments not reduce the obligation to pay the hourly straight time or overtime wages found to be prevailing shall not apply if otherwise provided in a bona fide collective bargaining agreement covering the worker. The requirement to pay at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages does not preclude use of an alternative workweek schedule adopted pursuant to Section 511 or 514 of the Labor Code.

(2) Certify to the lead agency that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to perform all construction work on the transit and transportation facilities project. All of the
 following requirements shall apply to the transit and transportation facilities project:

(A) The transit and transportation facilities project proponent shall require in all contracts for the performance of work that every contractor and subcontractor at every tier will individually use a skilled and trained workforce to complete the transit and
 transportation facilities project.

(B) Every contractor and subcontractor shall use a skilled and trained workforce to complete the transit and transportation facilities project.

(C) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), the transit and transportation facilities project proponent shall provide to the lead agency, on a monthly basis while the transit and transportation facilities project or contract is being performed, a report demonstrating compliance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. A monthly report provided to the lead agency pursuant to this clause shall be a public record under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of
 the Government Code) and shall be open to public inspection. A transit and transportation facilities project proponent that fails to provide a monthly report demonstrating compliance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code shall be subject to a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per month for each month for which the report has not been provided. Any contractor or subcontractor that fails to use a skilled and trained workforce shall be subject to a civil penalty of two hundred dollars ($200) per day for each worker employed in contravention of the skilled and trained workforce requirement. Penalties may be assessed by the Labor Commissioner within 18 months of completion of the transit and transportation facilities project using the same procedures for
 issuance of civil wage and penalty assessments pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, and may be reviewed pursuant to the same procedures in Section 1742 of the Labor Code. Penalties shall be paid to the State Public Works Enforcement Fund.

(ii) Clause (i) does not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the transit and transportation facilities project are subject to a project labor agreement that requires compliance with the skilled and trained workforce requirement and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 138.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.70.9.

Notwithstanding Section 21189.70.10, the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 21189.70.1 regarding the payment of prevailing wages and use of a skilled and trained workforce are material and integral parts of Section 21189.70.1. If the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 21189.70.1 cannot lawfully be applied to a transit-oriented development project, then the other provisions of 21189.70.1 shall be null and void with respect to that transit-oriented development project unless all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project are subject to a project labor agreement that provides hiring preferences for veterans and for apprentices who were emancipated minors or in foster care.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   (AB 2731)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.70.10.

Except as provided in Section 21189.70.9, the provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   (AB 2731)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Infrastructure Projects [21189.80. - 21189.91.]

21189.80.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) This division requires that the environmental impacts of development projects be identified and mitigated.

(b) This division also guarantees the public an opportunity to review and comment on the environmental impacts of a project and to participate meaningfully in the development of mitigation measures for potentially significant environmental impacts.

(c) Historic federal and state investments in infrastructure will lead to the development of numerous transportation-related, water-related,
 technology, and energy facilities across the state that would further California’s commitments to reducing emissions of greenhouse gases and protecting its people from the worst extremes of climate change while also leveraging federal resources to increase access to quality jobs in our communities.

(d) These projects will further generate full-time jobs during construction and additional jobs once the projects are constructed and operating.

(e) The transportation-related projects would help state, regional, and local agencies more quickly meet the goals of advancing safety, rehabilitating the aging transportation infrastructure, and addressing the impacts of climate change.

(f) The transportation-related projects will
 accelerate critical state, regional, and local “fix it first” projects supported by a historic federal and state partnership through Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2017, and the federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (Public Law 117-58).

(g) The purpose of this chapter is to provide unique streamlining benefits under this division for critical state, regional, and local investments in climate resiliency, safety, and infrastructure maintenance while maintaining the environmental and public engagement benefits of this division for projects that provide the public benefits, including environmental and climate-related benefits, described above and to both achieve those benefits and put people to work as soon as possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 60, Sec. 6.   (SB 149)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.91.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.81.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Applicant” means a public or private entity or its affiliates, or a person or entity that undertakes a public works project, that proposes a project and its successors, heirs, and assignees.

(b) “Disadvantaged community” means an area identified by the California Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code or an area identified as a disadvantaged unincorporated community pursuant to Section 65302.10 of the Government Code.

(c) “Electrical transmission facility project” means a project for the construction and operation of an electrical
 transmission facility that meets either of the following:

(1) An electrical transmission facility project identified by the Independent System Operator in its annual transmission planning process that meets either of the following criteria:

(A) The project will facilitate delivery of electricity from renewable energy resources or zero-carbon resources.

(B) The project will facilitate delivery of electricity from energy storage projects.

(2) An electrical transmission facility project identified by a local publicly owned electric utility that would satisfy a transmission expansion need approved by the governing body of the local publicly owned electric utility and that meets either of the following criteria:

(A) The project will facilitate delivery of electricity from renewable energy resources or zero-carbon resources.

(B) The project will facilitate delivery of electricity from energy storage projects.

(d) (1) “Energy infrastructure project” means any of the following:

(A) An eligible renewable energy resource, as defined in Section 399.12 of the Public Utilities Code, excluding resources that combust biomass fuels.

(B) New energy storage systems of 20 megawatts or more, that are capable of discharging for at least two hours, provided that a pumped hydro facility may qualify only if it is less than or equal to 500 megawatts and has been directly appropriated funding by the
 state before January 1, 2023.

(C) A project for which the applicant has certified that a capital investment of at least two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) made over a period of five years and the project is for either of the following:

(i) The manufacture, production, or assembly of an energy storage system or component manufacturing, wind system or component manufacturing, and solar photovoltaic energy system or component manufacturing.

(ii) The manufacture, production, or assembly of specialized products, components, or systems that are integral to renewable energy or energy storage technologies.

(D) An electrical transmission facility project, provided that nothing in this chapter affects the jurisdiction of the California Coastal
 Commission pursuant to Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000) to regulate such projects if located in the coastal zone.

(E) A hydrogen production facility and associated onsite storage and processing facilities that do not derive hydrogen from a fossil fuel feedstock and that receive funding from any of the following:

(i) The Hydrogen Program established pursuant to Section 25664.1.

(ii) Section 91530, as added by the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Bond Act of 2024 (Section 2 of Chapter 83 of the Statutes of 2024 (Senate Bill No. 867)), if that act is approved by the voters at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election.

(iii) The Alliance for Renewable Clean Hydrogen Energy Systems (ARCHES)
 authorized by Article 15 (commencing with Section 12100.160) of Chapter 1.6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, as awarded by the United States Department of Energy Office of Clean Energy Demonstrations.

(2) Any project to develop a facility within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 25545 shall meet the requirements of Sections 25545.3.3 and 25545.3.5, except that those requirements shall also apply to solar photovoltaic and terrestrial wind electrical generating power plants with a generating capacity of between 20 and 50 megawatts and energy storage projects capable of storing between 80 and 200 megawatt hours of electrical energy.

(e) “Infrastructure project” means a project that is certified pursuant to Sections 21189.82 and 21189.83 as any of the following:

(1) An energy
 infrastructure project.

(2) A semiconductor or microelectronic project.

(3) A transportation-related project.

(4) A water-related project.

(f) “Semiconductor or microelectronic project” means a project that meets the requirements related to investment in new or expanded facilities and is awarded funds under the federal Creating Helpful Incentives to Produce Semiconductors Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-167), commonly known as the CHIPS Act of 2022, and the requirements of Section 21183.5.

(g) (1) “Transportation-related project” means a transportation infrastructure project that advances one or more of, and does not conflict with, the following goals related to the
 Climate Action Plan for Transportation Infrastructure adopted by the Transportation Agency:

(A) Build toward an integrated, statewide rail and transit network.

(B) Invest in networks of safe and accessible bicycle and pedestrian infrastructure.

(C) Include investments in light-, medium-, and heavy-duty zero-emission vehicle infrastructure.

(D) Develop a zero-emission freight transportation system.

(E) Reduce public health and economic harms and maximize community benefits.

(F) Make safety improvements to reduce fatalities and severe injuries of all users towards zero.

(G) Assess and integrate assessments of physical climate risk.

(H) Promote projects that do not significantly increase passenger vehicle travel.

(I) Promote compact infill development while protecting residents and businesses from displacement.

(J) Protect natural and working lands.

(2) Transportation-related projects are public works for the purposes of Section 1720 of the Labor Code and shall comply with the applicable provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(h) (1) “Water-related project” means any of the following:

(A) A project
 that is approved to implement a groundwater sustainability plan that the Department of Water Resources has determined is in compliance with Sections 10727.2 and 10727.4 of the Water Code or to implement an interim groundwater sustainability plan adopted pursuant to Section 10735.6 of the Water Code.

(B) (i) A water storage project funded by the California Water Commission pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 79750) of Division 26.7 of the Water Code.

(ii) In addition to clause (i), the applicant shall demonstrate that the project will minimize the intake or diversion of water except during times of surplus water and prioritizes the discharge of water for ecological benefits or to mitigate an emergency, including, but not limited to, dam repair, levee repair, wetland restoration, marshland restoration, or habitat preservation, or other public
 benefits described in Section 79753 of the Water Code.

(C) Projects for the development of recycled water, as defined in Section 13050 of the Water Code.

(D) Contaminant and salt removal projects, including groundwater desalination and associated treatment, storage, conveyance, and distribution facilities. This shall not include seawater desalination.

(E) Projects exclusively for canal or other conveyance maintenance and repair.

(2) Water-related projects are public works for purposes of Section 1720 of the Labor Code and shall comply with the applicable provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(3) “Water-related project” does not
 include the design or construction of through-Delta conveyance facilities of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 608, Sec. 1.   (SB 1420)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.91.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.81.1.

(a) For purposes of subdivision (d) of Section 21189.81, an “energy infrastructure project” includes the San Vicente Energy Storage Facility project proposed by the San Diego County Water Authority for pumped energy storage located in the eastern portion of the County of San Diego.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (h) of Section 21189.81, a “water-related project” includes a project for the repair, rehabilitation, or replacement of the South Bay Sewage Treatment Plant in the County of San Diego, operated by the International Boundary and Water Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 794, Sec. 1.   (SB 1342)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.91.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.82.

(a) (1) (A) The Governor may certify a project as an energy infrastructure project for purposes of this chapter if the project meets the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 21189.81.

(B) In addition to subparagraph (A), if the applicant is not the lead agency, the Governor shall ensure all of the following:

(i) The applicant agrees to pay the costs of the trial court and the court of appeal in hearing and deciding any case challenging a lead agency’s action on a certified project under this division, including payment of the costs for the appointment of
 a special master if deemed appropriate by the court, in a form and manner as provided in the rule of court adopted by the Judicial Council under Section 21189.85.

(ii) The applicant agrees to pay the costs of preparing the record of proceedings for the project concurrent with the review and consideration of the project under this division, in a form and manner specified by the lead agency for the project.

(iii) For a project for which environmental review has commenced, the applicant demonstrates that the record of proceedings is being prepared in accordance with Section 21189.86.

(2) (A) The Governor may certify a project as a semiconductor or microelectronic project for purposes of this chapter if
 the project meets the requirements of subdivision (f) of Section 21189.81.

(B) In addition to subparagraph (A), if the applicant is not the lead agency, the Governor shall ensure all of the following:

(i) The applicant agrees to pay the costs of the trial court and the court of appeal in hearing and deciding any case challenging a lead agency’s action on a certified project under this division, including payment of the costs for the appointment of a special master if deemed appropriate by the court, in a form and manner as provided in the rule of court adopted by the Judicial Council under Section 21189.85.

(ii) The applicant agrees to pay the costs of preparing the record of proceedings for the project concurrent with the
 review and consideration of the project under this division, in a form and manner specified by the lead agency for the project.

(iii) For a project for which environmental review has
 commenced, the applicant demonstrates that the record of proceedings is being prepared in accordance with Section 21189.86.

(3) The Governor may certify up to 20 transportation-related projects for purposes of this chapter, including up to 10 state projects proposed by the Department of Transportation and up to 10 local or regional projects, that meet the requirements of subdivision (g) of Section 21189.81.
